Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 7.8 Permanent Joint Committee on Veterans’ Affairs

22-7.8-1.
Permanent committee — Composition.

There is created a permanent joint committee of the general assembly on veterans’ affairs to consist of fifteen (15) members of the general assembly, eight (8) of whom shall be from the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker, not more than five (5) of whom shall be from the same political party; seven (7) of whom shall be from the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate, not more than five (5) of whom shall be from the same political party. Vacancies shall be filled in like manner as the original appointments. The members of the joint committee on veterans’ affairs shall serve so long as they shall remain members of the house from which they were appointed and until their successors are duly appointed and qualified. The chairpersonship of the committee shall alternate biennially from the senate to the house.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 30; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 69.

22-7.8-2.
Selection of officers.

Upon organization of the joint committee, by majority vote, one of their members shall be chosen as chairperson, another of their members shall be chosen vice-chairperson, and another of their members shall be chosen as secretary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 472, § 1.

22-7.8-3.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the committee to promote the development of a coordinated veterans’ program and to consult with all agencies dealing with veterans’ affairs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 472, § 1.

22-7.8-4.
Report and recommendations.

The joint committee on veterans’ affairs shall from time to time and at least annually report to the general assembly on its findings and the result of its studies, and make any recommendations to the general assembly and propose any legislation or initiate any studies that it shall deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 472, § 1.

22-7.8-5.
References to committee.

Each branch of the legislature shall refer to the joint committee all bills and resolutions dealing directly with veterans’ affairs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 472, § 1.

22-7.8-6.
Place of meeting — Quorum.

The joint committee on legislative services shall provide adequate space in the state house for the use of the joint committee on veterans’ affairs; provided, that the joint committee on veterans’ affairs may conduct hearings and hold meetings elsewhere when doing so will better serve its purposes. A majority in number of the joint committee on veterans’ affairs shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 472, § 1.